Yamls/V-lokny_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-24
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - локны 'to come'/ 'tulla'/ 'прийти' 
     локны+V+Inf: локны
     локны+V+Inf+PxSg2: локныт
     локны+V+Inf+Acc+PxSg2: локнытӧ
     локны+V+Inf+PxSg3: локныс
     локны+V+Inf+Acc+PxSg3: локнысӧ 
     локны+V+ConNeg+Pl: локтӧ 
     локны+V+ConNeg+Sg: лок
     локны+V+Imprt+Sg2: [лок, лок-ко]
     локны+V+Imprt+Pl1: [локтам, локтамӧ, локтамӧ-ко, локтамте, локтамӧте]
     локны+V+Imprt+Pl2: [локтӧ, локтӧ-ко, локтӧте]
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: локта
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: локтан
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: локтӧ
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [локтам, локтамӧ]
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [локтат, локтатӧ]
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [локтӧн, локтӧны]
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1: локта
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2: локтан
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3: локтас
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1: [локтам, локтамӧ]
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2: [локтат, локтатӧ]
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3: локтасӧ
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: локті
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: локтін
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: локтіс
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: [локтім, локтімӧ]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: [локтіт, локтітӧ]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: локтісӧ
     локны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: [локтӧмыт, локтӧмат]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: [локтӧм, локтӧма]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: [локтӧмныт, локтӧмась]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: локтӧмась
     локны+V+Inf+Comp: локныжык
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Comp: локтажык
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Comp: локтанжык
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Comp: локтӧжык
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Comp: [локтамжык, локтамӧжык]
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Comp: [локтатжык, локтатӧжык]
     локны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Comp: [локтӧнжык, локтӧныжык]
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Comp: локтажык
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Comp: локтанжык
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Comp: локтасжык
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Comp: [локтамжык, локтамӧжык]
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Comp: [локтатжык, локтатӧжык]
     локны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Comp: локтасӧжык
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Comp: локтіжык
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Comp: локтінжык
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Comp: локтісжык
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Comp: [локтімжык, локтімӧжык]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Comp: [локтітжык, локтітӧжык]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Comp: локтісӧжык
     локны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+Comp: [локтӧмытжык, локтӧматжык]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+Comp: [локтӧмжык, локтӧмажык]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+Comp: [локтӧмнытжык, локтӧмасьжык]
     локны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+Comp: локтӧмасьжык
    
     локны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Compl: локтік
     локны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill: локтікӧ
     локны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxSg1: локтікам
     локны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxSg2: локтікат
     локны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxSg3: локтікас
     локны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxPl1: локтіканым
     локны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxPl2: локтіканыт
     локны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxPl3: локтіканыс
     локны+V+Der/ӧмӧн+Ger: локтӧмӧн
     локны+V+Der/ӧмӧн+Ger+Comp: локтӧмӧнжык  
     локны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger: [локтытӧдз, локтӧдз]
     локны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg1: [локтытӧдззам, локтытӧдззим, локтӧдззам, локтӧдззим]
     локны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg2: [локтытӧдззат, локтытӧдззит, локтӧдззат, локтӧдззит]
     локны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg3: [локтытӧдззас, локтытӧдззис, локтӧдззас, локтӧдззис]
     локны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl1: [локтытӧдззаным, локтытӧдззиным, локтӧдззаным, локтӧдззиным]
     локны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl2: [локтытӧдззаныт, локтытӧдззиныт, локтӧдззаныт, локтӧдззиныт]
     локны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl3: [локтытӧдззаныс, локтытӧдззиныс, локтӧдззаныс, локтӧдззиныс]
     локны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger: [локтытӧн, локтӧн]
     локны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg1: [локтытӧнням, локтытӧнним, локтӧнням, локтӧнним]
     локны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg2: [локтытӧннят, локтытӧннит, локтӧннят, локтӧннит]
     локны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg3: [локтытӧнняс, локтытӧннис, локтӧнняс, локтӧннис]
     локны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl1: [локтытӧнняным, локтытӧнниным, локтӧнняным, локтӧнниным]
     локны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl2: [локтытӧнняныт, локтытӧнниныт, локтӧнняныт, локтӧнниныт]
     локны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl3: [локтытӧнняныс, локтытӧнниныс, локтӧнняныс, локтӧнниныс]
     локны+V+Der/тӧг+Ger: [локтытӧг, локтӧг]
     локны+V+Der/тӧг+Ger+PxSg1: [локтытӧгьям, локтӧгьям]
     локны+V+Der/тӧг+Ger+PxSg2: [локтытӧгьят, локтӧгьят]
     локны+V+Der/тӧг+Ger+PxSg3: [локтытӧгьяс, локтӧгьяс]
     локны+V+Der/тӧг+Ger+PxPl1: [локтытӧгьяным, локтӧгьяным]
     локны+V+Der/тӧг+Ger+PxPl2: [локтытӧгьяныт, локтӧгьяныт]
     локны+V+Der/тӧг+Ger+PxPl3: [локтытӧгьяныс, локтӧгьяныс]
     
     локны+V+Der/ӧм+PrfPrc+Sg: локтӧм
     локны+V+Der/ӧм+PrfPrc+Pl: локтӧмӧсь
     локны+V+Der/ись+Act+PrsPrc+Sg: локтісь
     локны+V+Der/ись+Act+PrsPrc+Pl: локтісьӧсь
     локны+V+Der/ян+PrsPrc+Sg: локтан
     локны+V+Der/ян+PrsPrc+Pl: локтанӧсь
     локны+V+Der/яна+PrsPrc+Sg: локтана
     локны+V+Der/яна+PrsPrc+Pl: локтанаӧсь
     локны+V+Der/тӧм+Prc+Sg: локтытӧм
     локны+V+Der/тӧм+Prc+Pl: локтытӧмӧсь
